Utah statutes.
41-6a-710.   Roadway divided into marked lanes -- Provisions -- Traffic-
control devices.
On a roadway divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for traffic the
following provisions apply:
(1) (a)  A person operating a vehicle:
(i)  shall keep the vehicle as nearly as practical entirely within a single
lane; and
(ii)  may not move the vehicle from the lane until the operator has reasonably
determined the movement can be made safely.
(b)  A determination under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) is reasonable if a reasonable
person acting under the same conditions and having regard for actual and
potential hazards then existing would determine that the movement could be
made safely.
(2)  On a roadway divided into three or more lanes and providing for two-way
movement of traffic, a person operating a vehicle may not drive in the center
lane except:
(a)  when overtaking and passing another vehicle traveling in the same
direction, and when the center lane is:
(i)  clear of traffic within a safe distance; and
(ii)  not a two-way left turn lane;
(b)  in preparation of making or completing a left turn in compliance with
Section 41-6a-801; or
(c)  where the center lane is allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the
same direction that the vehicle is proceeding as indicated by traffic-control
devices.
(3) (a)  A highway authority may erect traffic-control devices directing
specified traffic to use a designated lane or designating those lanes to be
used by traffic moving in a particular direction regardless of the center of
the roadway.
(b)  An operator of a vehicle shall obey the directions of a traffic-control
device erected under Subsection (3)(a).
